District of Columbia statutes.
29-709.05

Proceeds and expenses.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section:

(1)

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, shall belong to the limited partnership and not to the derivative plaintiff;

(2)

If the derivative plaintiff receives any proceeds, the derivative plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the limited partnership.

(b)

If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, the Superior Court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, from the recovery of the limited partnership.

(c)

A derivative action on behalf of a limited partnership may not be voluntarily dismissed or settled without the Superior Court’s approval.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(10)(B), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added (c).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1005 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).